Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB535.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5227YC (4) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Direct each institution of higher 3 education under its control to adopt a policy prohibiting land 4 acknowledgments by the institution or any department or other 5 unit of the institution. This subsection does not apply to 6 discussion in a classroom or research setting or statements 7 made by a person not speaking in an official capacity on behalf 8 of the institution or any department or other unit of the 9 institution. 10